Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2994.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; WOMENVENTURE.new text end new text begin (a) $1,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the workforce development fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to the Hennepin County Sheriff's Office for a pilot program with WomenVenture to recruit a cohort of child care providers to provide services for the minor children of law enforcement and other first responders that will accommodate shift work and abnormal work hours and enhance employee recruitment and retention. Grant money may be used to provide technical support, loan accessibility, business plan development, geographic needs assessment, and start-up and training cost subsidies to cohort providers, as well as to fund scholarships for participating families. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2027. new text end new text begin (b) By December 1, 2027, the Hennepin County Sheriff's Office must submit a report to the chairs and raking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over child care, public safety, and employment and economic development. The report must include a summary of the uses of the appropriation and recommendations to implement future child care programs to enhance recruitment and retention for law enforcement and other first responders. new text end